Washington statutes.
RCW 19.126.010

Purpose.

(1) The legislature recognizes that both suppliers and wholesale distributors of malt beverages and spirits are interested in the goal of best serving the public interest through the fair, efficient, and competitive distribution of such beverages. The legislature encourages them to achieve this goal by:

(a) Assuring the wholesale distributor's freedom to manage the business enterprise, including the wholesale distributor's right to independently establish its selling prices; and

(b) Assuring the supplier and the public of service from wholesale distributors who will devote their best competitive efforts and resources to sales and distribution of the supplier's products which the wholesale distributor has been granted the right to sell and distribute.

(2) This chapter governs the relationship between suppliers of malt beverages and spirits and their wholesale distributors to the full extent consistent with the Constitution and laws of this state and of the United States.

[ 2012 c 2 s 212 (Initiative Measure No. 1183, approved November 8, 2011); 2003 c 59 s 1; 1984 c 169 s 1.]

NOTES:

Finding—Application—Rules—Effective date—Contingent effective date—2012 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 1183): See notes following RCW 66.24.620.

Effective date—2003 c 59: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 17, 2003]." [ 2003 c 59 s 3.]